Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-604
Registration form; copies; disposition.

The department shall retain the registration form required by section 46-602 and shall make a copy available to the natural resources district within which the water well is located, to the owner of the water well, and to the licensed water well contractor as defined in section 46-1213.

Laws 1957, c. 200, § 4, p. 703;

Laws 1961, c. 227, § 4, p. 673;

Laws 1961, c. 230, § 3, p. 685;

Laws 1986, LB 886, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 131, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 171;

Laws 2001, LB 667, § 5;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1142;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 171.